Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 4. Alcoholism and Drug Abuse Revolving Loan Fund.

Sec. 44.29.210.
Creation of an alcoholism and drug abuse revolving loan fund.

There is created in the department an alcoholism and drug abuse revolving loan fund as required under 42 U.S.C. 300x-25 to qualify the state to receive block grant money from the United States Department of Health and Human Services under 42 U.S.C. 300x-21.

The fund consists of money appropriated to it, payments of principal on loans made from it, and money chargeable to principal that is collected through liquidation by foreclosure or other process on loans made from it.

Money in the fund may be used as required under 42 U.S.C. 300x-25 to make loans to private nonprofit organizations for the cost of establishing programs to help pay the living expenses of individuals recovering from alcohol or drug abuse who may reside in groups.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1990; am §§ 54, 55 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Sec. 44.29.215.
Special account established.

There is established as a special account within the alcoholism and drug abuse revolving loan fund the foreclosure expense account. This account is established as a reserve from fund equity.

The department may expend money credited to the foreclosure expense account when necessary to protect the department’s security interest in collateral on loans made under AS

44.29.210

or to defray expenses incurred during foreclosure proceedings after a default by an obligor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1990)

Sec. 44.29.220.
Administration of loan program.

The department may

adopt regulations necessary to carry out its functions under AS

44.29.210

—

44.29.230

and to administer the program required under 42 U.S.C. 300x — 4a, including regulations to establish reasonable fees for services provided, procedures for foreclosure proceedings, and procedures for collecting delinquent accounts;

establish amortization plans for the repayment of loans;

charge and collect the fees established under this subsection; and

contract for the servicing of loans made under AS

44.29.210

.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1990; am § 28 ch 90 SLA 1991)

Sec. 44.29.225.
Disposal of property acquired by default or foreclosure.

The department shall dispose of property acquired through default or foreclosure on a loan made under AS

44.29.210

. Disposal shall be made in a manner that serves the best interests of the state and may include the amortization of payments over a period of years.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1990)

Sec. 44.29.230.
Definition.

In AS

44.29.210

—

44.29.230

, “department” means the Department of Health and Social Services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 80 SLA 1990)